Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Subchapter 11. Miscellaneous

§ 3501.
Construction and application.

This chapter shall be so applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 3502.
Rules for cases not provided for in this chapter.

In any case not provided for in this chapter the provisions of the Uniform Partnership Act govern.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 3503.
Savings clause.

The repeal of any statutory provision by this act does not impair, or otherwise affect, the organization or the continued existence of a limited partnership existing at the effective date of this act, nor does the repeal of any existing statutory provision by this act impair any contract or affect any right accrued before the effective date of this act.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.